California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 6.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.60.

Funding decisions made by the board shall not, in themselves, make the board liable for any tort, breach of contract, or any other action for damages caused by a school district arising from new construction or modernization by the district. These contracts include, but are not limited to, contracts between the school district and its construction contractors, construction managers, architects, or engineers. The school district shall be liable for all torts, breaches of contract, or any other actions for damages caused by the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.63.

(a) The total funding provided under this chapter shall constitute the state’s full and final contribution to the project and for eligibility for state facilities funding represented by the number of unhoused pupils for which the school district is receiving the state grant. As a condition of receipt of funds, a school district shall certify that the grant amount, combined with local funds, shall be sufficient to complete the school construction project for which the grant is intended.

(b) Any funds provided to a school district under any article in this chapter may not be counted towards the local match for receipt of funds under any other article in this chapter.

(c) Any savings achieved by the district’s efficient and prudent expenditure of these funds shall be retained by the district in the county fund for expenditure by the district for other high priority capital outlay purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.65.

From any moneys in one of the funds established pursuant to Section 17070.40, as appropriate, and approved for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the board shall make available to the Director of General Services the amounts that the board determines necessary for the Department of General Services to provide the assistance, pursuant to this chapter, required pursuant to Section 15504 of the Government Code to facilitate the construction, modernization, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, school buildings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 6.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.70.

(a) Title, including, but not limited to, any leasehold interest as set forth in subdivision (c), to all property acquired, constructed, or improved with funds made available under this chapter shall be held by the school district to which the board grants the funds. Title, as defined solely for the purpose of a school district’s eligibility to receive funds from the board pursuant to this chapter shall include an order for prejudgment possession issued by a court in an eminent domain proceeding.

(b) The applicant school district shall comply with all laws pertaining to the construction, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, school buildings.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 17009.5, construction or modernization funds made available pursuant to this chapter may be expended upon property that is leased to the applicant school district only if the project qualified for and received approval by the board, prior to November 4, 1998, pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17055), of Chapter 12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 7.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.71.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 17070.70, new construction or modernization funded pursuant to this chapter may be upon real property leased to the applicant school district if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The property is leased from another governmental entity.

(2) The term of the lease is for at least 40 years after approval of the project under this chapter, or the school district has a lease for at least 25 years on federal property. The board may authorize a lesser term, of not less than 30 years only if the board finds that granting an exception to this requirement would be in the state’s best interest.

(b) The applicant school district, and the facility on leased land, if any, shall comply with all laws pertaining to the construction, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, schoolsites and school buildings.

(c) Lease costs are not eligible project or site acquisition costs under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 530, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.73.

(a) A school district may claim the entire pupil attendance of a charter school that is physically located within its geographical jurisdiction, within the per-pupil eligibility calculation in support of a project for school facilities pursuant to this chapter.

(b) A school district shall not include the attendance of pupils attending a charter school that is physically located outside of the geographical jurisdiction of the school district, within the per-pupil eligibility calculation in support of an application for a project pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The requirements and conditions for funding charter school facilities in this section and in Article 12 (commencing with Section 17078.50) are intended to regulate only the funding of facilities under this chapter, and are not intended to expand, narrow, or raise any inference regarding, the nature or scope of any other law that is applicable to charter school governance, organization, or operation.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) apply only to projects funded with the proceeds of state bonds approved by the voters after January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 935, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.75.

(a) The board shall require the school district to make all necessary repairs, renewals, and replacements to ensure that a project is at all times maintained in good repair, working order, and condition. All costs incurred for this purpose shall be borne by the school district.

(b) In order to ensure compliance with subdivision (a) and to encourage school districts to maintain all buildings under their control, the board shall require an applicant school district to do all of the following before the approval of a project:

(1) Establish a restricted account within the general fund of the school district for the exclusive purpose of providing moneys for
 ongoing and major maintenance of school buildings, according the highest priority to funding for the purposes set forth in subdivision (a). Funds in the account may be used for drought mitigation purposes related to the implementation of Executive Order B-29-15.

(2) (A) Agree to deposit into the account established pursuant to paragraph (1), in each fiscal year for 20 years after receipt of funds under this chapter, a minimum amount equal to or greater than 3 percent of the total general fund expenditures of the applicant school district, including other financing uses, for that fiscal year.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for the 2015–16 and 2016–17 fiscal years, the minimum amount required to be deposited into the account established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be the lesser of the following amounts:

(i) Three percent of the total general fund expenditures for that fiscal year.

(ii) The amount that the school district deposited into the account in the 2014–15 fiscal year.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for the 2017–18 to 2019–20 fiscal years, inclusive, the minimum amount required to be deposited into the account established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be the greater of the following amounts:

(i) The lesser of 3 percent of the general fund expenditures for that fiscal year or the amount that the school district deposited into the account in the 2014–15 fiscal year.

(ii) Two percent of the total general fund expenditures of the applicant school district for that fiscal year.

(D) A school district contribution to the account may be provided in lieu of meeting the ongoing maintenance requirements pursuant to Section 17014 to the extent the funds are used for purposes established in that section. A school district that serves as the administrative unit for a special education local plan area may elect to exclude from its total general fund expenditures, for purposes of this paragraph, the distribution of revenues that are passed through to participating members of the special education local plan area.

(E) This paragraph applies only to the following school districts:

(i) High school districts with an average daily attendance greater than 300 pupils.

(ii) Elementary school districts with an average daily attendance greater than
 900 pupils.

(iii) Unified school districts with an average daily attendance greater than 1,200 pupils.

(F) It is the intent of the Legislature that a school district shall be required to comply with the requirements of subparagraph (A) in the year in which the local control funding formula is fully implemented.

(3) Certify that it has publicly approved an ongoing and major maintenance plan that outlines the use of the funds deposited, or to be deposited, pursuant to paragraph (2). The plan may provide that the school district need not expend all of its annual allocation for ongoing and major maintenance in the year in which it is deposited if the cost of major maintenance requires that the allocation be carried over into another fiscal year. However, any state funds carried over into a subsequent year may not be
 counted toward the annual minimum contribution by the school district.

(c) A school district to which paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) does not apply shall certify to the board that it can reasonably maintain its facilities with a lesser level of maintenance.

(d) For purposes of calculating a county office of education requirement pursuant to this section, the applicable maintenance requirement specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be based upon the county office of education general fund less any restricted accounts.

(e) (1) This subdivision shall only apply to a school district that received funds pursuant to this chapter equal to or greater than 10 percent of the State School Facilities Funds of 1998, 2002, 2004, and 2006.

(2) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), a school district shall comply with the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) if the amount available in any fiscal year for the public school system pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution is equal to or greater than the amount available in the prior fiscal year, unless a school district has locally negotiated an alternative minimum annual deposit percentage in a collective bargaining agreement with the representatives of the school district’s skilled crafts employees.

(3) Under no circumstances shall a school district deposit less than the amounts required in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(4) This subdivision shall be operative from July 1, 2015, until June 30, 2020.

(f) As a condition of participation in the school facilities program, for a fiscal year after the 2004–05 fiscal year, a school district shall establish a facilities inspection system to ensure that each of its schools is maintained in good repair.

(g) For purposes of this section, “good repair” has the same meaning as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 9.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.755.

A priority for the use of funds in the restricted account established pursuant to Section 17070.75, shall be to ensure that facilities, including, but not limited to, restroom facilities for pupils, are functional and that they meet local hygiene standards generally applicable to public facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 358, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.76.

Notwithstanding Section 17070.75, for the 2003–04 fiscal year, the board shall only require a school district to deposit into the account established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17070.75 an amount equal to 2 percent of the total expenditures by a district from its general fund in the 2003–04 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 227, Sec. 8.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.766.

Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17070.75, for the 2008–09, 2009–10, 2010–11, 2011–12, 2012–13, 2013–14, and 2014–15 fiscal years, the board shall require a school district to deposit into the account established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17070.75 only an amount equal to 1 percent of the total expenditures by a district from its general fund in the 2008–09, 2009–10, 2010–11, 2011–12, 2012–13, 2013–14, and 2014–15 fiscal years respectively, but if the school district maintains its facilities in good repair, as defined in Section 17002, it shall be exempt from this 1 percent requirement. A school district may elect to deposit into the account an amount that is greater than the amount required by the board
 pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 7, Sec. 16.   (SB 70)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.77.

(a) For each project funded after January 1, 2002, the board shall require the applicant school district governing board to certify, as part of the school district’s annual budget process and beginning in the fiscal year in which the project is funded by the state, that it is in compliance with the plan adopted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 17070.75 for completing major maintenance requirements for the project.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the term “major maintenance” means all actions necessary to keep roofing, siding, painting, floor and window coverings, fixtures, cabinets, heating and cooling systems, landscaping, fences, and other items designated by the governing board of the school district in good repair.

(c) The board shall require the school district’s governing board to certify that the plan includes and is being implemented with all of the following components:

(1) Identification of the major maintenance needs for the project.

(2) Specification of a schedule for completing the major maintenance.

(3) Specification of a current cost estimate for the scheduled major maintenance needs.

(4) Specification of the school district’s schedule for funding a reserve to pay for the scheduled major maintenance needs.

(5) Review of the plan annually, as a part of the school district’s annual budget process, and update, as needed, the major maintenance needs, the estimates of expected costs, and any adjustments in funding the reserve.

(6) Availability for public inspection of the original plan, and all updated versions of the plan, at the office of the superintendent of the school district during the working hours of the school district.

(7) Provision in the school district’s annual budget for the reserve that contains the total funding available for scheduled major maintenance needs as specified in the updated plan, and an explanation if this amount of the reserve is less than that specified in the updated plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.80.

(a) All school facilities purchased or newly constructed pursuant to this chapter for use, in whole or in part, by pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, shall be designed and located on the schoolsite so as to maximize interaction between those individuals with exceptional needs and other pupils as appropriate to the needs of both.

(b) The governing board of each applicant school district and the county office of education shall ensure that school facilities for pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs are integrated with other school facilities.

(c) The State Allocation Board, after consultation with the State Department of Education and representatives from county offices of education, special education services regions, and school districts, shall develop and adopt any regulations necessary to implement this section.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the requirement set forth in subdivision (a) may be waived, by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, only upon compliance with the following procedure:

(1) The applicant school district or county superintendent of schools shall file a written request for waiver that documents the reasons for its inability to comply with the requirement.

(2) The State Department of Education shall verify the reasons set forth pursuant to paragraph (1), including the documentation submitted, which verification shall be completed no later than 30 days after the filing of the request for waiver with the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(3) The Advisory Commission on Special Education, as established under Section 33590, at its first scheduled meeting following the verification conducted pursuant to paragraph (2), shall review the request for waiver, accompanying documentation, and the verification findings of the State Department of Education. No later than 15 days following the date of that meeting, the commission shall submit its written comments and recommendations regarding the request for waiver to the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(4) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall review the comments and recommendations submitted by the Advisory Commission on Special Education prior to approving or rejecting the request for waiver.

(5) Any request for waiver, submitted in accordance with this section, that is not rejected within 60 days of its receipt by the State Department of Education, shall be deemed approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.85.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a lien recorded on school district property that has been imposed pursuant to Section 16019 or 17030 shall be released on the operative date of this section. The release shall conclusively protect any third party relying upon the same, and shall be acknowledged to permit recordation by the county recorder. On and after November 4, 1998, a lien may not be imposed pursuant to Section 16019 or Section 17030.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.87.

New construction and modernization applications submitted before October 31, 2024, shall be processed and apportioned in accordance with this chapter, as it read on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 7.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.90.

As a part of its application, a school district shall certify that it has considered the feasibility of the joint use of land and facilities with other governmental entities in order to minimize school facilities costs. Funds provided pursuant to this chapter for growth and modernization may be used for the school portion of joint-use facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.95.

As a part of its application for large construction and modernization projects, a school district shall certify, in consultation with the career technical education advisory committee established pursuant to Section 8070, that it has considered the need for vocational and career technical facilities to adequately meet its program needs consistent with Section 51224, subdivision (b) of Section 51225.3, and Section 52336.1. The board shall adopt regulations necessary for administration of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 8.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.955.

In conjunction with an application of a school district for any construction or modernization project, and as a condition of the district receiving funds for the project, the career technical education advisory committee for the district shall provide written confirmation that the need for vocational and career technical facilities is being adequately met within the district consistent with Section 51224, subdivision (b) of Section 51225.3, subdivision (b) of Section 51228, and Section 52336.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 778, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.96.

As part of its application for funding under this chapter, a school district shall certify that it has considered the feasibility of using designs and materials for the construction or modernization project that promote the efficient use of energy and water, the maximum use of natural lighting and indoor air quality, the use of recycled materials and materials that emit a minimum of toxic substances, the use of acoustics conducive to teaching and learning, and other characteristics of high performance schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 35, Sec. 2.   Effective May 20, 2006.   Operative after November 7, 2006, pursuant to Sec. 25 of Ch. 35, and adoption of Prop. 1D.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.965.

On or after January 1, 2015, the board shall not approve funding for incentive grants to promote the use of designs and materials in new construction and modernization projects that include the attributes of high-performance schools, including, but not limited to, the elements set forth in Section 17070.96.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 39, Sec. 2.   (SB 869)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.97.

The board shall require the school district to insure against public liability or property damage in connection with any facility constructed or modernized with an apportionment under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.98.

A school district that does not have employees who possess adequate construction management experience may contract for the provision of construction management, and may use funds provided pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 17072.10), Article 5 (commencing with Section 17072.20), and Article 7 (commencing with Section 17074.10) for the cost of those services as expressly authorized by Section 17072.35 and Section 17074.25.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.99.

(a) The board shall conduct an evaluation on the cost of new construction and modernization of small high schools in conjunction with the pilot program established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17072.10, as it read on January 1, 2005.

(b) The State Department of Education shall conduct an evaluation that focuses on pupil outcomes, including, but not limited to, academic achievement and college attendance rates, at the small high schools constructed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17072.10, as it read on January 1, 2005, and on the reasons school districts do not currently opt to build small high schools.

(c) The evaluations required pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be completed no later than two years after the opening of the last small high school constructed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17072.10, as it read on January 1, 2005.

(d) The evaluations conducted pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be used to inform the direction of future school facilities construction and related bond measures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 894, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Existing School Building Capacity [17071.10. - 17071.46.]

17071.10.

(a) The calculation determined by this article shall be made on a one-time basis, and will be used as the baseline for eligibility determinations pursuant to this chapter.

(b) (1) Each school district that elects to participate in the new construction program pursuant to this chapter shall submit to the board a one-time report of existing school building capacity.

(2) The information reflected in the report described in paragraph (1) shall be
 included in a school facilities master plan submitted pursuant to Section 17070.54.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a school district newly formed, reorganized, or affected by reorganization, pursuant to an election that occurred on or after November 4, 1998, shall calculate or recalculate its existing school building capacity pursuant to regulations adopted by the
 board.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), a school district that elects to participate in the new construction program or modernization program pursuant to this chapter after November 5, 2024, shall submit an updated report of the school district’s existing school building capacity to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 8.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.25.

(a) The existing school building capacity in the applicant school district or, where appropriate, in the attendance area, at the time of initial application shall be calculated pursuant to the following formula:

(1) Identify by grade level all permanent teaching stations existing in the school district or, where appropriate, the attendance area. For the purposes of this section, “teaching station” means any space that was constructed or reconstructed to serve as an area in which to provide pupil instruction, but shall not include portable buildings, except as provided in Section 17071.30.

(2) (A) The assumed capacity of each calculated teaching station pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be 25 pupils for each teaching station used for kindergarten or for grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and 27 pupils for each teaching station used for grades 7 to 12, inclusive. 

(B) On or after January 1, 2000, the board may adopt or amend regulations adjusting the assumed capacity set forth in this subparagraph as appropriate for each teaching station used for nonsevere or severe special day class purposes after considering the recommendations of the Legislative Analyst pursuant to Section 17072.15. These special day class capacity adjustments and any adjustment of existing school capacity related to changes in the assumed capacity of special day class teaching stations shall be approved by the Director of Finance prior to implementation.

(C) On or after January 1, 2001, the board may adopt regulations establishing assumed capacity standards after consideration of the recommendations developed by the Director of General Services for continuation high school, community day school, county community school, and county community day school, teaching stations pursuant to Section 17072.17. Teaching station assumed capacity adjustments pursuant to these regulations and any other adjustments of existing school capacity related to changes in the assumed capacity of continuation high school, community day school, county community school, and county community day school, teaching stations shall be approved by the Director of Finance prior to implementation.

(3) Multiply the assumed capacity of each teaching station as specified in paragraph (2) by the number of teaching stations calculated under paragraph (1).

(4) The result of this computation shall be the number of pupils housed by grade level in the existing school building capacity of the applicant school district.

(b) The existing school building capacity of the applicant school district calculated under this section shall not include, in any school operated on a year-round schedule, any teaching station that has been in continuous use during the preceding five-year period primarily for the operation of a preschool program or programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 858, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.30.

For purposes of determining the existing school building capacity, each applicant school district shall include each portable classroom, whether owned or leased, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a) or (b).

(a) Portable classrooms leased pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) shall be excluded from the existing school building capacity. Portable classrooms obtained by an applicant district pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17088.5 shall be excluded from the existing school building capacity, except as to any portable classroom or classrooms for which the district rejected the board’s offer to purchase pursuant to that subdivision. Portable classrooms leased for a period of less than five years prior to the date of application shall not be included in existing school building capacity.

(b) The number of portable classrooms, reduced by the number of portable classrooms used as interim housing for modernization projects, that exceed 25 percent of the number of permanent classrooms available to the district shall not be included in the existing building capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.33.

(a) For the purposes of determining existing school building capacity, the calculation shall be adjusted as required for first priority status pursuant to Section 17017.7 as that calculation would have been made under the policies of the board in effect immediately preceding September 1, 1998.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), with respect to a high school district, the existing school building capacity shall be calculated without regard to multitrack year-round school considerations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 9.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.35.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the maximum school building capacity for each applicant district shall be increased by the number of pupils reported by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for that grade level pursuant to Section 42268. This adjustment shall be calculated on the basis, at the district’s option, of either the district as a whole or the appropriate attendance area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.40.

Each school on a year-round, multitrack calendar that has a density of 200 or more pupils enrolled per acre, that is located in a school district with 40 percent of its pupils attending multitrack, year-round schools shall be exempted from the increase in school building capacity required by Section 17071.35. Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting the school from the requirements of Section 17071.33.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17071.46.

(a) If an applicant school district proposes to demolish a single-story building and replace it with a multistory building on the same site, the State Allocation Board shall provide a supplemental grant for 50 percent of the replacement cost of the single-story building to be demolished, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The cost of the demolition and construction of a new multistory building on the same site is less than the total cost of providing a new school facility, including land, on a new site for the additional number of pupils housed as a result of the multistory replacement building on the existing site, as determined by the State Allocation Board. For purposes of this subdivision, the method of estimating the site acquisition costs savings shall be based on previous actual site sizes and acquisition costs in the district for equivalent numbers of pupils, or as otherwise determined by the board if actual site acquisition comparisons are not available for the district.

(2) The school district will maximize the increase in pupil capacity on the site when it builds the multistory replacement building, subject to the limits imposed on it pursuant to paragraph (3).

(3) The State Department of Education has determined that the demolition of an existing single-story building and replacement with a multistory building at the site is the best available alternative and will not create a school with an inappropriate number of pupils in relation to the size of the site, as determined by the State Department of Education.

(b) The State Allocation Board shall establish additional requirements it deems necessary to ensure that the economic interests of the state and the educational interests of the children of the state are protected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 904, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. New Construction Eligibility Determination [17071.75. - 17071.76.]

17071.75.

After a one-time initial report of existing school building capacity has been completed, the ongoing eligibility of a school district for new construction funding shall be determined by making all of the following calculations:

(a) A school district that applies to receive funding for new construction shall use the following methods to determine projected enrollment:

(1) A school district that has two or more schoolsites each with a pupil population density that is greater than 115 pupils per acre in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, or a schoolsite pupil population density that is greater
 than 90 pupils per acre in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, as determined by the Superintendent using enrollment data from the California Basic Educational Data System for the 2004–05 school year, may submit an application for funding for projects that will relieve overcrowded conditions. That school district may also submit an alternative enrollment projection for the fifth year beyond the fiscal year in which the application is made using a methodology other than the cohort survival enrollment projection method, as defined by the board pursuant to paragraph (2), to be reviewed by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance, in consultation with the department and the Office of Public School Construction. If the Office of Public School Construction and the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance jointly determine that the alternative enrollment projection provides a reasonable
 estimate of expected enrollment demand, a recommendation shall be forwarded to the board to approve or disapprove the application, in accordance with all of the following:

(A) Total funding for new construction projects using this method shall be limited to five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), from the Kindergarten-University Public Education Facilities Bond Act of 2004.

(B) The eligibility amount for proposed projects that relieve overcrowding is the difference between the alternative enrollment projection method for the year the application is submitted and the cohort survival enrollment projection method, as defined by the board pursuant to paragraph (2), for the same year, adjusted by the existing pupil capacity in excess of the projected enrollment according
 to the cohort survival enrollment projection method.

(C) The Office of Public School Construction shall determine whether each proposed project will relieve overcrowding, including, but not limited to, the elimination of the use of Concept 6 calendars, four track year-round calendars, or busing in excess of 40 minutes, and recommend approval to the board. The number of unhoused pupil grants requested in the application for funding from the eligibility determined pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to the number of seats necessary to relieve overcrowding, including, but not limited to, the elimination of the use of Concept 6 calendars, four track year-round calendars, or busing in excess of 40 minutes, less the number of unhoused pupil grants attributed to that school as a source school in an approved application pursuant to Section
 17078.24.

(D) A school district shall use the same alternative enrollment projection methodology for all applications submitted pursuant to this paragraph and shall calculate those projections in accordance with the same districtwide or high school attendance area used for the enrollment projection made pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) A school district shall calculate enrollment projections for the fifth year beyond the fiscal year in which the application is made. Projected enrollment shall be determined by using the cohort survival enrollment projection system, as defined and approved by the board. The board may supplement the cohort survival enrollment projection with any of the following:

(A) The number of unhoused pupils
 that are anticipated as a result of dwelling units proposed pursuant to approved and valid tentative subdivision maps.

(B) Modified weighting mechanisms, if the board determines that they best represent the enrollment trends of the district. Mechanisms pursuant to this subparagraph shall be developed and applied in consultation with the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance.

(C) An adjustment to reflect the effects on kindergarten and first grade enrollment of changes in birth rates within the school district or high school attendance area boundaries.

(3) (A) A school district may submit an enrollment projection for either a 5th year or a 10th year beyond the fiscal year in which the
 application is made. A school district that bases its enrollment projection calculation on a high school attendance area may use pupil residence in that attendance area to calculate enrollment. A school district that uses pupil residence shall do so for all high school attendance areas within the district. A pupil shall not be included in a high school attendance area enrollment projection based on pupil residence unless that pupil was included in the California Basic Educational Data System (CBEDS) report of the district for the same enrollment year. The board may require a district to provide a reconciliation of the districtwide CBEDS and residency data. The board also may adopt regulations to specify the format and certification requirements for a school district that submits residency data.

(b) (1) Add the
 number of pupils that may be adequately housed in the existing school building capacity of the applicant school district as determined pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 17071.10) to the number of pupils for whom facilities were provided from any state or local funding source after the existing school building capacity was determined pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 17071.10). For this purpose, the total number of pupils for whom facilities were provided shall be determined using the pupil loading formula set forth in Section 17071.25.
